Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 1. Mississippi Business Finance Corporation.

§ 57-10-1.
Declaration of public policy and legislative intent.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of this state and the purpose of this article to improve and stimulate the state’s economy in general, and the small business segment thereof in particular, by establishing a program to stimulate and supplement the flow of private equity capital and long-term loan funds which small business concerns of this state need for the sound financing of their business operations and for their growth, expansion and modernization, and which are not available in adequate supply. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy shall be carried out in such manner as to insure the maximum participation of private financing sources. It is further hereby declared that the public welfare of the state demands the establishment of such a program to provide for the maximum development of this state’s agricultural, industrial and commercial resources, offering increased employment opportunities for all of the citizens of the state, encouraging the establishment of new agricultural, industrial and commercial enterprises and providing the citizens of the state of all races greater opportunities for entrepreneurship.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-101; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

§ 57-10-3.
Administration.

The Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc., created pursuant to Section 57-10-167, hereinafter referred to as the “corporation,” shall exercise the powers and duties and discharge the responsibilities as provided herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-102; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 11; Laws, 1992, ch. 481 § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1992).

§§ 57-10-5 and 57-10-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 14, eff from and after March 30, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, §§ 8940-103, 8940-104; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, §§ 3, 4]

§ 57-10-9.
General purposes of corporation.

This corporation is organized, and it shall be operated primarily for the purpose of providing financial resources necessary to implement the economic development of the state by creating a pool of capital assets to expand the agricultural, industrial and commercial enterprises of the state and to provide loan guaranties for term loans to improve the marketability of such loans, and to encourage the expansion of available equity financing through small business investment companies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-105; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 422, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1982).

§§ 57-10-11 through 57-10-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 14, eff from and after March 30, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, §§ 8940-106-8940-108; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, §§ 6-8]

§ 57-10-17.
General powers and duties of board of directors.

The board of directors of the corporation is hereby authorized, in its discretion, based on sound business principles, to:

Receive applications for and make direct term loans to small businesses, including any person, firm, corporation, joint stock company, partnership, association or trust located within the state unable to obtain sufficient funds for the successful operation of such businesses from conventional commercial sources or other governmental agencies or in the event the financial needs of such businesses exceed the legal loan limits of local banks or other financial institutions or in the event the degree of risk involved in extending loans to such businesses exceed local standards;

Make direct equity investments and/or seed money loans to local economic development corporations;

Seek the participation of private banks or financial institutions, either within or without the state, in the term loans extended by the corporation;

Sell its own commercial paper and other evidences of indebtedness to obtain funds for the making of term loans to creditworthy businesses;

Provide a loan guaranty program for conventional loans extended to qualified small businesses in the State of Mississippi;

Sell its debenture bonds to banks and other financial institutions;

Apply for and receive funds in any amount from any private source or federal governmental entity, or the Small Businessman’s Loan Fund or Guaranty Fee Fund as authorized by Sections 57-10-101 through 57-10-137, whether by way of grant, donation or loan;

Make contracts, including contracts for services, and incur liabilities for any of the purposes authorized herein;

Borrow money for any of the purposes authorized herein; incur debt, including the power to issue therefor its bonds, debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, whether secured or unsecured; and secure the same by mortgage, pledge, deed of trust or other lien on its property, rights and privileges of every kind and nature, or any part thereof, or interest therein;

Purchase, receive, hold, lease or acquire by foreclosure, and sell, convey, transfer or lease real and personal property, together with such rights and privileges as may be incidental and appurtenant thereto and the use thereof, including, but not restricted to, any real or personal property acquired by the corporation from time to time in the satisfaction of debts or enforcement of obligations;

Make all expenditures and incur any obligations reasonably required in the exercise of sound business principles to secure possession of, preserve, maintain, insure and, if necessary, improve real and personal property acquired in the liquidation of investments in order to realize the maximum return for the corporation on any sale or disposition thereof;

Acquire, subscribe for, own, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage or pledge the stock, shares, bonds, debentures, notes or other securities and evidences of interest in or indebtedness of any person, firm, corporation, joint stock company, partnership, association or trust, and, while the owner or holder thereof, exercise all the rights, powers and privileges of ownership, including the right to vote thereon;

Mortgage, pledge or otherwise encumber any property right or thing of value acquired pursuant to the powers contained in paragraphs (j), (k) or (l) as security for the payment of any part of the purchase price thereof;

Cooperate with and assist and otherwise encourage agencies, organizations, local or regional, private or public, in the various communities of the state in the promotion, assistance and development of the business prosperity and economic welfare of such communities or of this state or of any part thereof;

Do all acts and things necessary and proper to create, form, participate in or fund a State SBA 503 program as authorized under Title V, Section 503 of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, as amended, Section 697, Title XV, United States Code;

Do all acts and things necessary and proper to carry out the powers expressly granted in this article, including, but not limited to, employment of administrative and clerical staff, and such other employees as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix their compensation, and to perform its powers and functions through its officers, agents and employees;

Do all acts and things necessary and proper for the issuance of bonds for solid waste facilities;

Do all acts and things necessary to operate the Mississippi Development Bank pursuant to Section 31-25-1 et seq.;

Maintain an office in the name of the corporation at such place or places within this state as it may designate without the approval of any other state agency or department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-109; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 9; Laws, 1982, ch. 422, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 481 § 8; Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 6, 2001.).

§ 57-10-19.
Purchase of debentures and common stock of small business investment companies.

In addition to the other powers and authority prescribed by this article, the corporation may purchase debentures or the common stock of small business investment companies or minority enterprise small business investment companies, incorporated or domiciled in the state under the provisions of the Small Business Investment Law of 1958, as amended, which debentures may be subordinate to any other debenture bonds, promissory notes or other debts and obligations of such small business investment companies except for those purchased by the small business administration in accordance with the Federal Small Business Investment Act of 1958, as amended (15 USCS Sections 661 et seq.); any purchases by the corporation of stock shall be made from funds derived from sources other than the State of Mississippi. The corporation is prohibited from investing in both the stock and evidences of indebtedness of any company.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-112; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 12; Laws, 1982, ch. 422, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1982).

§ 57-10-21.
Conditions of loans to small business investment companies.

Any loans by the corporation to a small business investment company or minority enterprise small business investment company, shall be conditioned on the following:

A loan to a small business investment company or minority enterprise small business investment company shall not exceed the amount of its outstanding portfolio investments or the amount of its private paid-in capital and paid-in surplus, whichever is less.

The small business investment company or minority enterprise small business investment company must agree that the entire loan will be invested in firms located in this state.

The repayment period for any such loan shall not exceed fifteen (15) years but such loans need not be amortized.

Such other conditions as may be prescribed by the board of directors of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-113; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

§ 57-10-23.
Annual fee of small business investment companies.

Any small business investment company or minority enterprise small business investment company wishing to participate under this article shall pay a five hundred dollar ($500.00) fee annually on July 1 to the corporation which shall be deposited in a qualified state depository, to the credit of the “Mississippi Economic Development Corporation.” The annual fee paid on its initial application shall be prorated according to the date of application.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-115; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

§ 57-10-25.
Funding of corporation; investments of corporation.

It is the further intention of this article that the initial capital base of the corporation be raised from a combination of private foundation grants, any funds available from various federal programs, and such funds as may be appropriated by the state. Additional funding of the corporation may be derived from the sale of debenture bonds or long-term funding from the sale of the corporation’s commercial paper and notes. Such additional funding and any guaranty executed by the corporation of any loan or investment, and any other obligations incurred by the corporation, shall be based solely on the credit of the corporation and shall not pledge or loan the credit of the state in aid of any person, association or corporation. Funds of the corporation shall be primarily invested in amortized loans of ten (10) years or shorter maturity. If feasible and possible, all loans extended by the corporation shall be made in participation with existing banks or other financial institutions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-110; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

§ 57-10-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1982, ch. 422, § 6, eff from and after March 30, 1982.

[Codes, 1942, § 8940-118; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 18; Laws, 1974, ch. 547, § 2]

§ 57-10-29.
Disposition of funds received by corporation; annual audit.

All funds received by the corporation from any source whatsoever shall be deposited in a qualified state depository to the credit of the “Mississippi Economic Development Corporation,” said funds to be disbursed therefrom upon checks drawn upon said account after approval of said board and signed by the chairman and treasurer of the corporation. The post audit division of state government shall audit said corporation’s books not less than once each year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-116; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

§ 57-10-31.
Liabilities of officers, directors, agents, and employees of corporation.

No officer or director of this corporation shall ever be held personally liable for contracts, debts or defaults of this corporation nor shall any mere informality in organization have the effect of rendering these null or of exposing the officers or directors to any such liability or responsibility. However, the officers, directors, agents and employees of the corporation shall be liable for any fraudulent or illegal diversion or misappropriation of the funds of the corporation which any such person knowingly and willfully caused, permitted or conspired to permit to be made, and all such officers, directors, agents and employees entrusted with the custody of the securities of or authorized to disburse the funds of the corporation shall be bonded, either by a blanket bond or by individual bonds, with a surety bond or bonds with a minimum limitation of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) coverage for each person covered thereby, conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties, the premium for which shall be paid out of the assets of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-116; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 16; Laws, 1974, ch. 547, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 6, 2001.).

§ 57-10-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, § 8940-101; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 19]

§ 57-10-35.
Cooperation of state agencies and educational institutions.

All state agencies shall cooperate with the corporation, and all public institutions of higher education shall work with the corporation to facilitate the utilization of technological information by small businesses in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-114; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

§ 57-10-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2001).

[Codes, 1942, § 8940-111; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).]

§ 57-10-39.
Annual report.

An annual report concerning the operation of this article shall be submitted by the corporation to the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-120; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 20; Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 6, 2001.).

§ 57-10-41.
Dissolution and liquidation.

In the event of dissolution and liquidation of the corporation, whether voluntary or involuntary or by reason of the repeal of this article and thereby terminating its corporate existence, any surplus assets of the corporation in excess of the corporation’s outstanding liabilities shall be transferred to the State of Mississippi and shall automatically vest in said state, and the chairman and treasurer of the corporation shall execute and deliver such conveyances or documents as are necessary to show title in the state or to vest such assets in the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-117; Laws, 1972, ch. 439, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).